Utah statutes.
17-53-215.   Seal for clerk of district court.

If a county provides clerk services to that county's district court, the legislative body of the county shall:

(1)  provide a seal for the clerk of the district court of the county, the impression of which shall contain the words "District Court, State of Utah," together with the name of the county; and

(2)  file an impression of the seal in the office of the county clerk and with the Division of Archives.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

